Washington statutes.
RCW 39.28.010

Definitions.

The following terms wherever used or referred to in RCW 39.28.010 through 39.28.030 shall have the following meaning unless a different meaning appears from the context.

(1) The term "municipality" shall mean the state, a county, city, town, district or other municipal corporation or political subdivision;

(2) The term "governing body" shall mean the body, a board charged with the governing of the municipality;

(3) The term "law" shall mean any act or statute, general, special or local, of this state, including, without being limited to, the charter of any municipality;

(4) The term "bonds" shall mean bonds, interim receipts, certificates, or other obligations of a municipality issued or to be issued by its governing body for the purpose of financing or aiding in the financing of any work, undertaking or project for which a loan or grant, or both, has heretofore been made or may hereafter be made by any federal agency;

(5) The term "Recovery Act" shall mean any acts of the congress of the United States of America to reduce and relieve unemployment or to provide for the construction of public works;

(6) The term "federal agency" shall include the United States of America, the president of the United States of America, and any agency or instrumentality of the United States of America, which has heretofore been or hereafter may be designated, created or authorized to make loans or grants;

(7) The term "public works project" shall mean any work, project, or undertaking which any municipality, is authorized or required by law to undertake or any lawful purpose for which any municipality is authorized or required by law to make an appropriation;

(8) The term "contract" or "agreement" between a federal agency and a municipality shall include contracts and agreements in the customary form and shall also be deemed to include an allotment of funds, resolution, unilateral promise, or commitment by a federal agency by which it shall undertake to make a loan or grant, or both, upon the performance of specified conditions or compliance with rules and regulations theretofore or thereafter promulgated, prescribed or published by a federal agency. In the case of such an allotment of funds, resolution, unilateral promise, or commitment by a federal agency, the terms, conditions and restrictions therein set forth and the rules and regulations theretofore or thereafter promulgated, prescribed or published shall, for the purpose of RCW 39.28.010 through 39.28.030, be deemed to constitute covenants of such a contract which shall be performed by the municipality, if the municipality accepts any money from such federal agency.

[ 1971 c 76 s 4; 1937 c 107 s 2; RRS s 10322A-8. Prior: 1935 c 107 s 2; RRS s 10322A-2.]

NOTES:

Short title: "This act may be cited as 'The Municipal Emergency Procedure Act (Revision of 1937)'." [ 1937 c 107 s 1; RRS s 10322A-7. Prior: 1935 c 107 s 1; RRS s 10322A-1.]

Severability—1937 c 107: "If any provision of this act, or the application thereof to any person, body, or circumstances shall be held invalid, the remainder of the act and the application of each provision to persons, bodies, or circumstances other than those as to which it shall have been held invalid shall not be affected thereby." [ 1937 c 107 s 5; RRS s 10322A-11. Prior: 1935 c 107 s 5; RRS s 10322A-5.]